California statutes. Public Utilities Code
 defined in Section 313 of the Penal Code, shall provide for a one-time waiver of all subscriber charges associated with a collect call when the call contains harmful matter and the person making or accepting the call is a minor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 170, Sec. 2.   Effective July 24, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

2885.

The commission shall, on or before July 1, 1987, determine the feasibility of requiring that, whenever a call is placed from a cellular telephone, the person receiving the call receive a notification indicating that the call is being placed from a cellular telephone and that the telephone conversation may not be totally private. The determination of feasibility shall include findings and conclusions on the necessity for, and the costs of, implementing a cellular telephone call notification system and on subscriber reaction to the notification system or systems proposed or employed. If the commission determines, in view of its findings and conclusions, that it
 is feasible for telephone corporations to implement a cellular telephone call notification system, it shall, by rule or order, require telephone corporations operating cellular telephones to implement that system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1101, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2885.6.

(a) The commission shall require mobile telephony service, as defined in Section 224.4, carriers to provide the commission, within six months of the effective date of the act that adds this section, and thereafter as requested by the commission, with information, as specified by the commission, concerning service quality and customer complaints.

(b) In addition to any other sanctions available, the commission shall have the authority to assess any and all of the following
 specific penalties for mobile telephony carrier noncompliance with commission rules, practices, and procedures respecting the filing of required periodic information and reports to the commission:

(1) The revocation or suspension, on an expedited basis, of temporary tariffing authority granted the carrier.

(2) The revocation or suspension, on an expedited basis, of other rate flexibility or promotional program authority granted the carrier.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 198, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

2886.

(a) The commission shall require every telephone corporation furnishing mobile telephony service, as defined in Section 224.4, to establish a pricing system made available to subscribers that shall distinguish on the billing invoice charges to a subscriber for calls not completed from any other service charge on the billing invoice.

(b) The commission shall require that those calls which are not completed shall not be charged more than 50 percent of the charge established for
 completed subscriber initiated calls.

(c) For purposes of this section, a call is not completed when it originates from the mobile telephony service handset and any of the following occurs:

(1) The terminating line is busy and the originator receives a busy signal.

(2) The terminating line does not answer and the originator receives an audible ring.

(3) No radios are available and the originator receives a reorder signal.

(4) The mobile telephony switching office cannot connect the call to the public network and the originator receives a reorder signal.

(5) The public network cannot complete the call to the terminating number
 and the originator receives a reorder signal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 198, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

2888.

The commission shall pursue all available legal remedies to redraw intrastate inter-exchange, also known as local access and transport area, or LATA, boundaries for the purpose of eliminating restrictions that result in discriminatory costs, added inconvenience, and less service for consumers of telecommunications services solely in and between the Counties of Monterey and Santa Cruz.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 941, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

2889.

(a) An information provider engaged in furnishing any live, recorded, or recorded-interactive audio text through information access telephone service shall provide a (1) delayed timing of information charges and (2) price disclosure message.

(b) The telephone corporation shall provide information providers, described in subdivision (a), with a period of a minimum of 12 seconds for a delayed timing of information charges and price disclosure message. If the delayed timing period is exceeded, a consumer shall be billed from the time of the initial connection, and transport
 charges shall be billed to the information provider from the time of the initial connection. If the consumer disconnects the call within the delayed timing period, no information charge shall be billed to the caller.

(c) (1) During the delayed timing period, the information provider shall inform the consumer of all of the following:

(A) The name of the programs.

(B) The information charge for the call.

(C) The date the information was recorded, if the information is a recorded message.

(D) That if the caller disconnects the call within the delayed timing period, the consumer will not be charged for the call.

(2) This information shall be provided at the beginning of every call and at least three seconds shall be allowed at the end of the message within the delayed timing period for the consumer to hang up without being charged if he or she has not already disconnected the call. The information provider shall provide a tone to indicate the end of the delayed timing period.

(d) This section does not apply to audiotex programs with restricted access via personal identification number (PIN) code or special password.

(e) As used in this section, “delayed timing of information charges” means a service feature which delays commencement of billing of charges for a minimum of 12 seconds in order to provide the information required by subdivision (c).

(f) Every violation of this section is a
 misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1317, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1991, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1317.)
-------------------------------------------

2889.2.

No telephone corporation or provider of information-access telephone services shall charge the subscribing party for a call made to a telephone number with an “800” prefix, unless the telephone number with an “800” prefix is an information service complying with the presubscription requirements imposed by Federal Communications Commission Docket No. 93–22.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 170, Sec. 3.   Effective July 24, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

2889.3.

(a) (1) Before a telephone corporation exits the business of providing interexchange services to all of its customers or to an entire class of its customers, the telephone corporation or any person, firm, or corporation representing the telephone corporation, shall provide those affected customers with a written notice at least 30 days prior to the proposed transfer of those customers to another telephone corporation. The notice shall include all of the following:

(A) A straightforward description of the proposed transfer.

(B) All applicable rates, terms, and conditions of the new service.

(C) A statement of the customer’s right to transfer to another telephone corporation.

(D) A toll-free customer service telephone number for the purpose of responding to customers’ questions.

(2) Any transfer of customer services shall be effectuated without charge.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply when the telephone corporation has entered into a written contract with the customer and when the change in telephone corporation results in no rate increase for the customer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 663, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

2889.4.

(a) A local exchange service provider that offers and charges for pay per use features that do not require an access code to be dialed to activate the service shall provide a new residential subscriber, including an existing residential customer ordering an additional line, during the verbal service order process, with information about those features. The representatives of a provider shall offer that subscriber blocking options for those features.

(b) (1) A
 local exchange service provider that offers the features described in subdivision (a) shall advise an existing residential subscriber who inquires about the features, or who seeks a bill adjustment for the inadvertent or unauthorized use of those per use custom calling features, that the features can be blocked and shall inquire as to whether the subscriber would like to block any or all of the features.

(2) (A) A local exchange service provider that offers the features described in subdivision (a) shall provide notice to all existing residential subscribers not later than May 1, 2000, describing all features provided on a per use basis, the charge for each activation, any additional usage or other charges, and detailed information about the ability to block these features.

(B) The notice shall contain a toll-free number for further information and shall
 contain a noticeable postcard size bill insert that may be returned in the subscriber’s bill envelope if they wish to block any or all of the per use features described in subdivision (a).

(c) A local exchange service subscriber that has not blocked per use features in accordance with this section is entitled to a one-time bill adjustment which shall equal the sum of the charges for every incident that occurred during the first billing cycle pursuant to which the subscriber notifies the local exchange service provider that inadvertent or unauthorized activation occurred with regard to those per use services that do not require coded dialing to activate. The one-time bill adjustment shall include an adjustment for any additional usage charges occurring as a result of inadvertent or unauthorized activation. The adjustment shall take the form of a credit to the subscriber’s account if the existing technology or facilities of the local exchange
 service provider measure usage and permit a usage credit to be determined and provided.

(d) Nothing in this section prohibits a local exchange service provider from providing additional bill adjustments at its discretion in connection with charges imposed for features described in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 384, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

2889.5.

(a) No telephone corporation, or any person, firm, or corporation representing a telephone corporation, shall make any change or authorize a different telephone corporation to make any change in the provider of any telephone service for which competition has been authorized of a telephone subscriber until all of the following steps have been completed:

(1) The telephone corporation, its representatives or agents shall thoroughly inform the subscriber of the nature and extent of
 the service being offered.

(2) The telephone corporation, its representatives or agents shall specifically establish whether the subscriber intends to make any change in his or her telephone service provider, and explain any charges associated with that change.

(3) For sales of residential service, the subscriber’s decision to change his or her telephone service provider shall be confirmed by an independent third-party verification company, or as provided in paragraph (5). For purposes of this provision, the confirmation by a third-party verification company shall be made as follows:

(A) The third-party verification company shall meet each of the following criteria:

(i) Be independent from the telephone corporation that seeks to provide the subscriber’s
 new service.

(ii) Not be directly or indirectly managed, controlled, or directed, or owned wholly or in part, by the telephone corporation that seeks to provide the new service or by any corporation, firm, or person who directly or indirectly manages, controls, or directs, or owns more than 5 percent of the telephone corporation.

(iii) Operate from facilities physically separate from those of the telephone corporation that seeks to provide the subscriber’s new service.

(iv) Not derive commissions or compensation based upon the number of sales confirmed.

(B) The telephone corporation seeking to verify the sale shall do so by connecting the subscriber by telephone to the third-party verification company or by arranging for the third-party verification
 company to call the subscriber to confirm the sale.

(C) The third-party verification company shall obtain the subscriber’s oral confirmation regarding the change, and shall record that confirmation by obtaining appropriate verification data. The record shall be available to the subscriber upon request. Information obtained from the subscriber through confirmation shall not be used for marketing purposes. Any unauthorized release of this information is grounds for a civil suit by the aggrieved subscriber against the telephone corporation or its employees who are responsible for the violation.

(D) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C), a service provider shall not be required to comply with these provisions when the customer directly calls the local service provider to make changes in service providers. However, a service provider shall not avoid the verification
 requirements by asking a subscribing customer to contact a local exchange service provider directly to make any change in the service provider. A local exchange service provider shall be required to comply with these verification requirements for its own competitive services. However, a local exchange service provider shall not be required to perform any verification requirements for any changes solicited by another telephone corporation.

(4) For a sale of residential service, the telephone corporation seeking to verify the change in service, in addition to the requirements of paragraph (3), shall notify the subscriber by United States Postal Service that the subscriber’s telephone service provider has been changed. The service provider that initiated the change shall send that notice within 14 days of the date of the change. The notice shall provide the subscriber with clear, legible notice of the change in service provider, and shall include
 a customer service telephone number for the subscriber to call if the subscriber did not authorize the change in service.

(5) Confirmation of a sale of residential service may be made using an electronic means that complies with Section 64.1120 of Title 47 of the Code of Federal Regulations in effect as of June 17, 2008.

(6) For sales of all nonresidential services, the subscriber’s decision to change his or her service provider shall be confirmed through any of the following means:

(A) Independent third-party verification, as set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(B) The telephone corporation shall mail to the subscriber an information package seeking confirmation of his or her change in the telephone corporation. The information package shall
 describe the new service and shall include a postage prepaid postcard or mailer that the subscriber can use to deny, cancel, or confirm a service order, as soon as possible, and wait 14 days after the information package is mailed before making the change in the telephone corporation. The telephone corporation shall make the change only if the subscriber does not cancel the change in service order.

(C) Verify the subscriber’s change in his or her telephone service provider by obtaining the subscriber’s signature on a document fully explaining the nature and extent of the action. The document shall be a separate document whose sole purpose is to explain the nature and extent of the action.

(D) Obtain the subscriber’s authorization through an electronic means that takes the information, including the calling number, and confirms the change to which the subscriber has given his or
 her consent.

(7) Where the telephone corporation obtains a written order for service, the document shall thoroughly inform the subscriber of the nature and extent of the action. The subscriber shall be furnished with a copy of the signed document. The subscriber by his or her signature on the document shall indicate a full understanding of the relationship being established with the telephone corporation. If a written subscriber solicitation or other document contains a letter of agency authorizing a change in service provider, in combination with other information including, but not limited to, inducements to subscribers to purchase service, the solicitation shall include a separate document whose sole purpose is to explain the nature and extent of the action. If any part of a mailing to a prospective subscriber is in language other than English, any written authorization contained in the mailing shall be sent to the same prospective
 subscriber in the same language.

(8) The telephone corporation shall retain a record of the verification of the sale for at least one year. These records shall be made available to the subscriber, the Attorney General, or the commission upon request.

(b) If a residential or business subscriber that has not signed an authorization notifies the telephone corporation within 90 days that he or she does not wish to change telephone corporations, the subscriber shall be switched back to his or her former telephone corporation at the expense of the telephone corporation that initiated the change.

(c) For purposes of this section, competitive services are those services where subscribers have the ability to presubscribe to a telephone service provider.

(d) When
 a subscriber changes telephone service providers, the change shall be conspicuously noticed on the subscriber’s bill. Notice in the following form is deemed to comply with this subdivision:
“NOTICE: Your local (or long distance) telephone service provider has been changed from (name of prior provider) to (name of current provider).
 Cost of change: $ ____.”

(e) Any telephone corporation that violates the verification procedures described in this section shall be liable to the telephone corporation previously selected by the subscriber in an amount equal to all charges paid by the subscriber after the violation.

(f) In addition to the liability described in subdivision (e), any telephone corporation that violates the verification procedures described in this section shall credit to a subscriber any charges paid by the subscriber in excess of the amount that the subscriber
 would have been obligated to pay had the subscriber’s telephone service not been changed. The commission shall adopt regulations to govern credits to subscribers pursuant to this subdivision.

(g) The remedies provided by this section are in addition to any other remedies available by law.

(h) As described in federal law, no telephone corporation, or any person, firm, or corporation representing a telephone corporation, shall make any change or authorize a different telephone corporation to make any change in the provider of any telephone service for which competition has been authorized of a telephone subscriber without having on file, or having instituted reasonable steps designed to obtain, signed, dated orders for service from the subscriber. All orders shall be in the form prescribed in federal law for letters of agency. As described in federal law, the telephone corporation
 is responsible for charges associated with disputed changes in telephone service for which it cannot produce a signed, dated order for service from the subscriber. This subdivision applies to all intrastate services for which competition has been authorized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 162, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

2889.6.

The commission shall, by rule or order, require all local exchange carriers to do both of the following:

(a) Include in their telephone directory information concerning emergency situations which may affect the telephone network. The information shall include the procedures which the corporation will follow during emergencies, how telephone subscribers can best use the telephone network in an emergency situation, and the emergency services available by dialing “911.”

(b) Annually provide to all subscribers in the form of a billing
 insert, which need not be a separate document, information concerning emergency situations which may affect the telephone network. The information shall include the procedures which the corporation will follow during emergencies, how telephone subscribers can best use the telephone network in an emergency situation, and the emergency services available by dialing “911.” The billing insert shall additionally direct the subscriber to consult the telephone directory for similar information concerning the use of the telephone in emergency situations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 524, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2889.8.

The commission periodically shall assess the reliability of the public telecommunications network and, if necessary, develop recommendations for improvement. The assessment shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) An analysis of those factors that pose a risk to network reliability, including the adequacy of independent sources of reserve power.

(b) Consideration as to whether development of reliability standards
 is appropriate.

(c) Consideration as to whether procedures should be developed to notify customers about accessing other telecommunications companies in the event of a service disruption.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1005, Sec. 65.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

2889.9.

(a) No person or corporation shall misrepresent its association or affiliation with a telephone carrier when soliciting, inducing, or otherwise implementing the subscriber’s agreement to purchase the products or services of the person or corporation, and have the charge for the product or service appear on the subscriber’s telephone bill.

(b) The provisions of Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 2100) of Part 1 of Division 1 apply to a public utility subject to this section and
 Section 2890. If the commission finds that a person or corporation or its billing agent that is a nonpublic utility, and is subject to the provisions of this section and Section 2890, has violated any requirement of this article, or knowingly provided false information to the commission on matters subject to this section and Section 2890, the commission may enforce Sections 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111, and 2114 against those persons, corporations, and billing agents as if the persons, corporations, or billing agents were a public utility. Neither this authority nor any other provision of this article grants the commission jurisdiction to regulate persons or corporations or their billing agents who are not otherwise subject to commission regulation, other than as specifically set forth in this section and Section 2890.

(c) If the commission finds that a person, corporation, or billing agent is operating in
 violation of any provision of this section and Section 2890, the commission may order the billing telephone company to terminate the billing and collection services for that person, corporation, or billing agent. Nothing in this section and Section 2890 precludes a billing telephone company from taking action on its own to terminate billing and collection services.

(d) The commission shall establish rules that require each billing telephone company, billing agent, and company that provides products or services that are charged on subscribers’ telephone bills, to provide the commission with reports of complaints made by subscribers regarding the billing for products or services that are charged on their telephone bills as a result of the billing and collection services that the billing telephone company provides to third parties, including affiliates of the billing telephone company.

(e) If the commission receives more than 100 complaints regarding unauthorized telephone charges in any 90-day period as to a person, corporation, or billing agent’s activities that are subject to Section 2890 and this section, the commission’s consumer services division shall commence a formal or informal investigation. The commission, to further the purposes of Section 2890 and this section, may change the number of complaints in any 90-day period that initiates the commencement of an investigation. This subdivision does not prohibit the commission’s consumer services division from opening any investigation it deems necessary to enforce Section 2890 or this section.

(f) Failure by a person, corporation, or billing agent to respond to commission staff requests for information is grounds for the commission to order the billing telephone company or companies that are providing billing and collection services to cease billing and
 collection services for the person, corporation, or billing agent.

(g) Persons or corporations originating charges for products or services, their billing agents, and telephone corporations billing for these products or services shall cooperate with the commission in the commission’s efforts to enforce the provisions of this article.

(h) This section and Section 2890 do not obligate a billing telephone company to provide billing and collection services to a billing agent.

(i) The commission may adopt rules, regulations and issue decisions and orders, as necessary, to safeguard the rights of consumers and to enforce the provisions of this article.

(j) For the purposes of this section, “billing agent” means the clearinghouse or billing
 aggregator.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1036, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

2890.

(a) A telephone bill may only contain charges for products or services, the purchase of which the subscriber has authorized.

(b) When a person or corporation obtains a written order for a product or service, the written order shall be a separate document from any solicitation material. The sole purpose of the document is to explain the nature and extent of the transaction. Written orders and written solicitation materials shall be unambiguous, legible,
 and in a minimum 10-point type. Written or oral solicitation materials used to obtain an order for a product or service shall be in the same language as the written order. Written orders may not be used as entry forms for sweepstakes, contests, or any other program that offers prizes or gifts.

(c) The commission may only permit a subscriber’s local telephone service to be disconnected for nonpayment of charges relating to the subscriber’s basic local exchange telephone service, long-distance telephone service within a local access and transport area (intraLATA), long-distance telephone service between local access and transport areas (interLATA), and international telephone service.

(d) (1) A billing telephone company shall clearly identify, and use a separate billing section for, each person, corporation, or billing agent that generates a charge on a
 subscriber’s telephone bill. A billing telephone company may not bill for a person, corporation, or billing agent, unless that person, corporation or billing agent complies with paragraph (2).

(2) Any person, corporation, or billing agent that charges subscribers for products or services on a telephone bill shall do all of the following:

(A) Include, or cause to be included, in the telephone bill the amount being charged for each product or service, including any taxes or surcharges, and a clear and concise description of the service, product, or other offering for which a charge has been imposed.

(B) Include, or cause to be included, for each entity that charges for a product or service, information with regard to how to resolve any dispute about that charge, including the name of the party responsible for
 generating the charge and a toll-free telephone number or other no cost means of contacting the entity responsible for resolving disputes regarding the charge and a description of the manner in which a dispute regarding the charge may be addressed. Each telephone bill shall include the appropriate telephone number of the commission that a subscriber may use to register a complaint.

(C) Establish, maintain, and staff a toll-free telephone number to respond to questions or disputes about its charges and to provide the appropriate addresses to which written questions or complaints may be sent. The person, corporation, or billing agent that generates a charge may also contract with a third party, including, but not limited to, the billing telephone corporation, to provide that service on behalf of the person, corporation or billing agent.

(D) Provide a means for expeditiously
 resolving subscriber disputes over charges for a product or service, the purchase of which was not authorized by the subscriber. In the case of a dispute, there is a rebuttable presumption that an unverified charge for a product or service was not authorized by the subscriber and that the subscriber is not responsible for that charge. With regard to direct dialed telecommunications services, evidence that a call was dialed is prima facie evidence of authorization. If recurring charges arise from the use of those subscriber-initiated services, the recurring charges are subject to this section.

(e) If an entity responsible for generating a charge on a telephone bill receives a complaint from a subscriber that the subscriber did not authorize the purchase of the product or service associated with that charge, the entity, not later than 30 days from the date on which the complaint is received, shall verify the subscriber’s authorization of that
 charge or undertake to resolve the billing dispute to the subscriber’s satisfaction.

(f) For purposes of this section, “billing agent” is the clearinghouse or billing aggregator.

(g) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2001.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1005, Sec. 65.7) by Stats. 2000, Ch. 931, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Section operative July 1, 2001, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2890.1.

The commission shall, on or before July 1, 2001, adopt any additional rules it determines to be necessary to implement the billing safeguards of Section 2890, for the inclusion of noncommunications-related products and services in telephone bills.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 931, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

2890.2.

(a) A provider of mobile telephony services, as defined in Section 224.4, shall provide subscribers with a means by which a subscriber can obtain reasonably current and available information, as determined by the provider, on the subscriber’s calling plan or plans and service usage, including roaming usage and charges.

(b) On or before January 1, 2007, a provider of mobile telephony services shall provide subscribers with a means by which a subscriber can obtain reasonably
 current and available information, as determined by the provider, on the subscriber’s text messaging and Internet usage and charges.

(c) Each provider of mobile telephony services shall inform subscribers at the time service is established of the availability of the information described in subdivisions (a) and (b) and how it may be obtained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 198, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Customer Right of Privacy [2891. - 2894.10.]

2891.

(a) A telephone or telegraph corporation shall not make available to any other person or corporation, without first obtaining the residential subscriber’s consent, in writing, any of the following information:

(1) The subscriber’s personal calling patterns, including any listing of the telephone or other access numbers called by the subscriber, but excluding the identification to the person called of the person calling and the telephone number from which the call
 was placed, subject to the restrictions in Section 2893, and also excluding billing information concerning the person calling that federal law or regulation requires a telephone corporation to provide to the person called.

(2) The residential subscriber’s credit or other personal financial information, except when the corporation is ordered by the commission to provide this information to any electrical, gas, heat, telephone, telegraph, or water corporation, or centralized credit check system, for the purpose of determining the creditworthiness of new utility subscribers.

(3) The services that the residential subscriber purchases from the corporation or from independent suppliers of information services who use the corporation’s telephone or telegraph line to provide
 service to the residential subscriber.

(4) Demographic information about individual residential subscribers, or aggregate information from which individual identities and characteristics have not been removed.

(b) Any residential subscriber who gives their written consent for the release of one or more of the categories of personal information specified in subdivision (a) shall be informed by the telephone or telegraph corporation regarding the identity of each
 person or corporation to whom the information has been released, upon written request. The corporation shall notify every residential subscriber of the provisions of this subdivision whenever consent is requested pursuant to this subdivision.

(c) Any residential subscriber who has, pursuant to subdivision (b), given written consent for the release of one or more of the categories of personal information specified in subdivision (a) may rescind this consent upon submission of a written notice to the telephone or telegraph corporation. The corporation shall cease to make available any personal information about the subscriber, within 30 days following receipt of the notice given pursuant to this subdivision.

(d) This section does not apply to any of the following:

(1) Information provided by residential subscribers for inclusion in the corporation’s directory of subscribers.

(2) Information customarily provided by the corporation through directory assistance services.

(3) Postal ZIP Code information.

(4) Information provided under supervision of the commission to a collection agency by the telephone corporation exclusively for the collection of unpaid debts.

(5) Information provided to an emergency service agency responding to a 911 telephone call or any other call communicating an imminent threat to life or property.

(6) Information provided to a law enforcement agency in response to lawful process.

(7) Information that is required by the commission pursuant to its jurisdiction and control over telephone and telegraph corporations.

(8) Information transmitted between telephone or telegraph corporations pursuant to the furnishing of telephone service between or within service areas.

(9) Information required to be provided by the corporation pursuant to rules and orders of the commission or the Federal Communications Commission regarding the provision over telephone lines by parties other than the telephone and telegraph corporations of telephone or information services.

(10) The name and address of the lifeline customers of a telephone corporation provided by that telephone corporation to a public utility for the sole purpose of low-income ratepayer assistance outreach efforts. The telephone corporation receiving the information request pursuant to this paragraph may charge the requesting utility for the cost of the search and release of the requested information.

(11) Information provided in response to a request pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 530.8 of the Penal Code.

(e) Every violation of this section is grounds for a civil suit by the aggrieved residential subscriber against the telephone or telegraph corporation and its employees responsible for the violation.

(f) For purposes of this section, both of the following definitions apply:

 (1) “Access number” means a telex, teletex, facsimile, computer modem, or any other code that is used by a residential subscriber of a telephone or telegraph corporation to direct a communication to another subscriber of the same or another telephone or telegraph corporation.

(2) “Lawful process” means an action taken pursuant to a court-ordered subpoena or judicial warrant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 347, Sec. 2.   (AB 1303)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2891.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 2891, a telephone corporation selling or licensing lists of residential subscribers shall not include the telephone number of any subscriber assigned an unlisted or unpublished access number. A subscriber may waive all or part of the protection provided by this subdivision through written notice to the telephone corporation.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 2891, a provider of mobile telephony services, or any direct or indirect affiliate or agent of a provider, providing the name and dialing number of a subscriber for inclusion in any directory of any form, or selling the contents of any directory database, or any portion or
 segment thereof, shall not include the dialing number of any subscriber without first obtaining the express consent of that subscriber. The express consent shall meet all of the following requirements:

(1) It shall be one of the following:

(A) A separate document that is signed and dated by the subscriber, and that is not attached to any other document.

(B) An affirmative response made on a separate field on an internet website where there is no default. The provider of mobile telephony services shall send a confirmation notice to the subscriber’s electronic mail address, or to a subscriber’s postal mail address if the subscriber does not have an electronic mail account.

(2) It shall be unambiguous, legible, and conspicuously disclose that, by opting in, the subscriber is consenting to have the subscriber’s dialing number sold or licensed as part of a list of subscribers and the subscriber’s dialing number may be included in a publicly available directory.

(3) If, under the subscriber’s calling plan, the subscriber may be billed for receiving unsolicited calls or text messaging from a telemarketer, the provider’s form shall include an unambiguous and legible disclosure statement that, by consenting to have the subscriber’s dialing number sold or licensed as part of a list of subscribers or included in a publicly available directory, the subscriber may incur additional charges for receiving unsolicited calls or text messages.

(c) Nothing in this section prohibits a subscriber of mobile
 telephony services from voluntarily entering into an agreement for the placement of the subscriber’s name and mobile telephony dialing number in any advertising program if the agreement satisfies the express consent requirements of this section.
